Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 11
COLORADO CHEMIGATION ACT

Editor's note:

This article was repealed in 1983 and was subsequently recreated and reenacted in 1987, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1983, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Section

35-11-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Chemigation Act".

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article RC&RE, p. 1278, § 1, effective July 1.

35-11-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Chemical" means any fertilizer or pesticide.

"Chemigation" means any process whereby chemicals are applied to land or crops in or with water through a closed irrigation system. "Chemigation" does not mean any process whereby chemicals are applied to land or crops in or with water pumped from a stock watering well, a domestic well with a diameter of two inches or less, or from a tailwater collection pond.

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture.

"Contamination" means the degradation of natural water quality as a result of man's activities.

"Department" means the department of agriculture.

"Fertilizer" means any formulation or product used as a plant nutrient which is intended to promote plant growth and contains one or more plant nutrients.

"Groundwater" means any water not visible on the surface of the ground under natural conditions.

"Irrigation system" means any device or combination of devices having a hose, pipe, or other conduit, which connects directly to any source of groundwater or surface water, through which water or a mixture of water and chemicals is drawn and applied for agricultural or horticultural purposes. "Irrigation system" does not include any hand-held hose sprayer or other similar device which is constructed so that an interruption in water flow automatically prevents any backflow to the water source and does not include stock water wells, any domestic well with a diameter of two inches or less, or a system which includes a tailwater collection pond.

"Open discharge system" means a system in which the water is pumped or diverted directly into a ditch or canal in such a manner that the force of gravity at the point of discharge into the ditch or canal cannot cause water to flow back to the point from which the water was pumped or diverted.

"Person" means a natural person, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, or any other legal or commercial entity.

"Pesticide" means any substance or mixture of substances intended for preventing, destroying, repelling, or mitigating any pest, insect, rodent, nematode, fungus, weed, or other form of plant or animal life or virus, except viruses on or in living humans or animals, and any substance or mixture of substances intended for use as a plant regulator, defoliant, or desiccant.

"Pollution" means the man-made or man-induced alteration of the physical, chemical, biological, or radiological integrity of water.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article RC&RE, p. 1278, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(2) and (8) amended, p. 1219, § 1, effective July 1.

35-11-103. Chemigation permit.

On and after January 1, 1990, no person shall apply or authorize the application of chemicals to land or crops through the use of chemigation unless such person obtains a chemigation permit from the department.

On and after July 1, 1987, a person may obtain, pursuant to section 35-11-105, a provisional chemigation permit from the department for the application of chemicals to land or crops through the use of chemigation.

Nothing in this section shall require a person to obtain a chemigation permit to pump or divert water mixed with any chemical to or through an open discharge system.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article RC&RE, p. 1279, § 1, effective July 1.

35-11-104. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to section 24-4-103, C.R.S., to:

Administer the chemigation permit program;

Establish equipment or performance standards and installation requirements;

Establish fees for the direct and indirect costs of administering the provisions of this article; and

Establish criteria for the entry of inspectors upon lands for purposes of conducting inspections.

The commissioner shall immediately notify the director of the department of public health and environment of the summary suspension of any permit, of the denial, suspension or revocation of a permit, including the specific reason thereof; and the commissioner shall also notify the director of the department of public health and environment of any criminal or civil proceeding brought pursuant to this article. The notice required herein shall contain the legal description of the location of the well which is the subject of the commissioner's action.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article RC&RE, p. 1279, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 2804, § 573, effective July 1.

35-11-105. Issuance of provisional chemigation permit - fees.

On and after July 1, 1987, and before January 1, 1990, any person who intends to utilize chemigation may, before commencing, file with the department an application for a provisional chemigation permit for each irrigation system utilizing chemigation. Such application shall be on forms provided by the department.

The applicant for a provisional chemigation permit shall, on the application, certify that the irrigation system for which he is seeking a permit includes properly installed and functioning equipment in compliance with section 35-11-107.

Upon receipt of a complete application for a provisional chemigation permit, the department may issue a provisional chemigation permit to the applicant for a specific irrigation system. The permit holder shall attach, in a prominent place, the permit to the irrigation system for which the permit was issued.

The fee for a provisional chemigation permit and the annual renewal permit shall be established by rule and regulation of the commissioner and shall reflect all direct and indirect costs for the administration of this article but shall not exceed fifty dollars. The inspection fee for a provisional chemigation permit shall be established by the commissioner and shall reflect all direct and indirect costs of the inspection but shall not exceed forty dollars. A provisional chemigation permit shall expire on March 31 of the year subsequent to the date the provisional chemigation permit was issued. The reinstatement fee for an expired provisional chemigation permit shall be double the amount of the fee for a provisional chemigation permit. A provisional chemigation permit shall not be assignable. The amount of indirect costs assessed under this subsection (4) shall be based on the number of FTE in the program expressed as a percentage of the total FTE in the department. In no case shall the indirect costs assessment exceed this percentage.

In the event that a ground water management district contracts with the department for the enforcement of the provisions of this article pursuant to the provisions of section 35-11-113, the amount of the provisional fee and the annual renewal fee for persons utilizing chemigation within such district shall be in an amount up to twenty dollars, as established by the commissioner. There shall be no state inspection fee for inspections made within such district.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article RC&RE, p. 1280, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(4) amended and (5) added, p. 1220, § 2, effective July 1.

35-11-106. Issuance of chemigation permit - fees.

On and after January 1, 1990, any person who intends to utilize chemigation shall, before commencing, file with the department an application for a chemigation permit for each irrigation system utilizing chemigation. Such application shall be on forms provided by the department.

The applicant for a chemigation permit shall, on the application, certify that the irrigation system for which he is seeking a permit includes properly installed and functioning equipment in compliance with the provisions of section 35-11-107. Upon receipt of a permit, the permit holder shall attach, in a prominent place, the permit to the irrigation system for which the permit was issued.

The fee for a chemigation permit and the annual renewal fee shall be established by the commissioner through rules. Such fees shall reflect all direct and indirect costs of the department for the administration of this article. The inspection fee shall be established by rule of the commissioner and shall reflect all direct and indirect costs for the inspection. A chemigation permit shall expire on March 31 of the year subsequent to the date the chemigation permit was issued. The reinstatement fee for an expired chemigation permit shall be double the amount of the fee for a chemigation permit. The reinstatement fee shall not be assessed to any person who filed an affidavit in lieu of a permit for the year prior to the year such person seeks a permit. A chemigation permit shall not be assignable. The amount of indirect costs assessed under this subsection (3) shall:

Repealed.

Effective July 1, 2006, be based on the number of FTE in the program expressed as a percentage of the total FTE in the department. In no case shall the indirect costs assessment exceed this percentage.

In the event that a ground water management district contracts with the department for the enforcement of the provisions of this article pursuant to the provisions of section 35-11-113, the amount of the fee and annual renewal fee, for persons utilizing chemigation within such district, shall be in an amount established by the commissioner. There shall be no state inspection fee for inspections made within such district.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article RC&RE, p. 1280, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(3) amended and (4) added, p. 1220, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 158, § 1, effective February 25.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 390, § 2, effective March 5.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3)(a)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (3)(a), effective July 1, 2006. (See L. 2003, p. 390.)

35-11-107. Equipment and installation requirements.

An irrigation system utilizing chemigation on and after January 1, 1990, or an irrigation system which has been issued a provisional chemigation permit shall have, as component parts thereof, a properly installed and functioning:

Backflow prevention check valve and vacuum relief valve between the main check valve and the irrigation pump;

Inspection port to check the performance of the check valve on the irrigation pipeline;

Automatic low-pressure drain placed between the main check valve and the irrigation pump so that a chemical will drain away from the source of water supply;

Check valve in the chemical injection line; and

Simultaneous interlock device between the power system of the chemical injection unit and the irrigation pumping plant to protect the water supply from contamination in the event such pumping plant ceases to operate.

An irrigation system which would otherwise be subject to all of the requirements of subsection (1) of this section may be exempted from one or more of such requirements if the owner of such irrigation system can demonstrate that the possibility of the source of water from which the irrigation system draws its water cannot be polluted or contaminated as the result of utilizing such irrigation system for chemigation.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article RC&RE, p. 1281, § 1, effective July 1.

35-11-108. Affidavit in lieu of permit.

For the calendar year beginning January 1, 1990, and for each calendar year thereafter, the owner of an irrigation system who does not intend to utilize chemigation during the calendar year shall notify the department of such intent. Notification shall be by an affidavit provided by the department.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article RC&RE, p. 1281, § 1, effective July 1.

35-11-109. Replacement or modification of equipment.

Any permit holder who replaces, alters, or modifies or who authorizes the replacement, alteration, or modification of chemigation equipment for an irrigation system which has been issued a chemigation permit shall notify the department within seven days of such replacement, alteration, or modification. Such notification shall be on a form provided by the department. The permit holder shall certify that the irrigation system as replaced, altered, or modified continues to comply with the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article RC&RE, p. 1281, § 1, effective July 1.

35-11-110. Failure to pass inspection - summary suspension - repair orders.

A permit holder operating any irrigation system which does not pass an inspection due to the failure to have installed and operating any device required by section 35-11-107 or the failure to properly install such a device shall have such permit summarily suspended by the inspector at the time of the inspection. Such summary suspension shall be subject to proceedings for suspension and revocation of the permit by the commissioner in accordance with the applicable provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S. Any irrigation system which has had its permit suspended or revoked shall not be used for chemigation until such irrigation system has been inspected and a reinstatement fee paid. Such reinstatement fee shall be in an amount which is double the amount of the permit fee plus the amount of the inspection fee.

A permit holder operating any irrigation system which does not pass an inspection because of a defect in any device which is properly installed shall be subject to a repair order issued by the inspector at the time of inspection. The permit holder shall remedy the defect within sixty days of the issuance of the order, and the inspector shall reinspect the irrigation system within ninety days of the issuance of the repair order. Any irrigation system subject to a repair order shall not be used for chemigation until the irrigation system is reinspected and the defect remedied. A fee may be charged or collected for the reinspection in specified circumstances described in the rules and regulations.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article RC&RE, p. 1282, § 1, effective July 1.

35-11-111. Inspections - entry upon land.

Each irrigation system for which a permit has been issued may be inspected once every two years.

Prior to an inspection, the inspector shall notify a permit holder of the time and date of an inspection. The inspector shall inform the permit holder that he is entitled to be present at the inspection. If a permit holder denies access to an inspector, the inspector may seek an inspection warrant issued by the district court for the district in which the permit holder's land is located. The court shall issue such inspection warrant upon presentation by the inspector of an affidavit stating: The information which gives the inspector reasonable cause to believe that any provision of this article is being violated or has been violated, or the information showing that such entry and inspection is required in order to determine whether the provisions of this article are being complied with, as the case may be, that the inspector notified the permit holder of an inspection, that the inspector was denied access by the permit holder, and a general description of the location of the affected land.

Each irrigation system subject to the provisions of this article which has not been issued a permit pursuant to the provisions of this article may be inspected, without prior notice, by an inspector who has information which gives him reasonable cause to believe that any provision of this article is being violated. If the landowner denies access to the inspector, the inspector may seek an inspection warrant issued by the district court for the district in which the landowner's land is located. The district court shall issue such inspection warrant upon presentation by an inspector of an affidavit stating: The information which gives the inspector reasonable cause to believe that any provision of this article is being violated or has been violated, that the landowner has denied access to the inspector, and a general description of the location of the affected land.

Except as otherwise provided in section 35-11-113, inspectors shall be employees of the department.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article RC&RE, p. 1282, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(1) amended, p. 1221, § 5, effective July 1.

35-11-112. Denial, suspension, or revocation of permit.

Pursuant to the applicable provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., the commissioner may deny, suspend, revoke, restrict, or refuse to renew the permit of an applicant or permit holder, as the case may be, who:

Fails to have installed and operating, or to have properly installed, any device required by section 35-11-107;

Has used for chemigation an irrigation system which is subject to a repair order under section 35-11-110 (2) and which has not been reinspected and approved;

Has utilized chemigation without a permit on or after January 1, 1990;

Has utilized for chemigation any equipment which did not, at the time of such use, meet the requirements established by section 35-11-107 or by any rule or regulation adopted by the commissioner pursuant to this article;

Has contaminated groundwater or surface water by the use of chemigation;

Has violated any provision of this article or any rule or regulation promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to this article.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article RC&RE, p. 1283, § 1, effective July 1.

35-11-113. Enforcement by ground water management districts.

Any ground water management district may contract with the department to enforce the provisions of this article and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article within the boundaries of the district. Inspectors in ground water management districts which contract with the department shall be employees of the district, and the state or the department shall not be liable for the acts or omissions of such inspectors.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article RC&RE, p. 1283, § 1, effective July 1.

35-11-114. Chemigation program management fund - transfer of moneys to plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund - fees.

All fees collected pursuant to this article shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund created in section 35-1-106.3. Within sixty days after July 1, 2009, the unexpended and unencumbered balance of the chemigation program management fund, as that fund existed prior to July 1, 2009, shall be transferred to the plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (HB 09-1249), ch. 87, p. 317, § 8, effective July 1, 2009.)

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article RC&RE, p. 1283, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1249), ch. 87, p. 317, § 8, effective July 1.

35-11-115. Penalties.

On and after January 1, 1990, any person utilizing chemigation without a permit commits a class 6 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401 (1)(a)(IV), C.R.S., and by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars.

Any person who violates any provision of subsection (1) of this section shall also be subject to a civil penalty assessed by the court of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than one thousand dollars for each such violation. All civil penalties collected under this subsection (2) shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund created in section 35-1-106.3.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article RC&RE, p. 1283, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(1) amended, p. 1221, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 848, § 126, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1547, § 307, effective October 1.

L. 2009:

(2) amended, (HB 09-1249), ch. 87, p. 317, § 9, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

35-11-116. Injunctive proceedings.

The department may, through the attorney general of the state of Colorado, apply for civil penalties and for an injunction to enjoin any person from committing any act declared to be unlawful by this article. Such application shall be heard in the district court of the county in which the grounds for the action arose.

In such proceedings, if the court enters a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction or awards civil penalties, the person against whom such injunctive order was entered or against whom such civil penalties were awarded shall pay the costs of the proceeding, including reasonable attorney fees.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article RC&RE, p. 1284, § 1, effective July 1.

35-11-117. Effective date of rules and regulations.

The effective date for the initial rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article shall be July 1, 1989.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 1221, § 6, effective July 1.